apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="l/ang__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>angt</l>      <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ange</l>      <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ange</l>      <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
 <!--> <e>       <p><l>ange</l>      <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="slimep"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
 <-->
  <e>       <p><l>ængere</l>    <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ængst</l>     <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ængste</l>    <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/gammel__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>gammel</l>    <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gammelt</l>   <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gamle</l>     <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gamle</l>     <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ældre</l>     <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ældst</l>     <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ældste</l>    <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/lille__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>lille</l>     <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lille</l>     <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>små</l>       <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lille</l>     <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>små</l>       <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindre</l>    <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindst</l>    <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindste</l>   <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/stor__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>stor</l>      <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stort</l>     <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>store</l>     <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>store</l>     <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>større</l>    <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>størst</l>    <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>største</l>   <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/ung__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>       <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungt</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unge</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unge</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngre</l>     <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngst</l>     <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngste</l>    <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sti/v__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>v</l>         <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vere</l>      <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<!--
  <e>       <p><l>vest</l>      <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>veste</l>     <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
-->
  <e>       <p><l>vest</l>      <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>veste</l>     <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bit/ter__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tert</l>      <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rere</l>      <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rest</l>      <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>reste</l>     <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="eg/en__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aktiv__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="amerikansk__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rå__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gammel">          <i></i><par n="/gammel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="år gammel">        <i>år<b/></i><par n="/gammel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lille">           <i></i><par n="/lille__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stor">            <i></i><par n="/stor__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ung">             <i></i><par n="/ung__adj"/></e>
<e lm="egen">            <i>eg</i><par n="eg/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="akademisk">       <i>akademisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aktiv">           <i>aktiv</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fuldstændig">     <i>fuldstændig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sand">            <i>sand</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anatomisk">       <i>anatomisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="asiatisk">        <i>asiatisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="belgisk">         <i>belgisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bitter">          <i>bit</i><par n="bit/ter__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blind">           <i>blind</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="daglig">          <i>daglig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dramatisk">       <i>dramatisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="enlig">           <i>enlig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsigtig">       <i>forsigtig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forskellig">      <i>forskellig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="frugtbar">        <i>frugtbar</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hel">             <i>hel</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ungdommelig">     <i>ungdommelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hollandsk">       <i>hollandsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hyggelig">        <i>hyggelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="intim">           <i>intim</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="klassisk">        <i>klassisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lang">            <i>l</i><par n="l/ang__adj"/></e>
<e lm="liberal">         <i>liberal</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lig">             <i>lig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="naiv">            <i>naiv</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="national">        <i>national</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="normal">          <i>normal</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="norsk">           <i>norsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="offentlig">       <i>offentlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="personlig">       <i>personlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rummelig">        <i>rummelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="russisk">         <i>russisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rå">              <i>rå</i><par n="rå__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjov">            <i>sjov</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="slank">           <i>slank</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stiv">            <i>sti</i><par n="sti/v__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sund">            <i>sund</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="syg">             <i>syg</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="synlig">          <i>synlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilfreds">        <i>tilfreds</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="udenlandsk">      <i>udenlandsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uskyldig">        <i>uskyldig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vestlig">         <i>vestlig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vild">            <i>vild</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="juridisk">        <i>juridisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kemisk">          <i>kemisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hysterisk">       <i>hysterisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="identisk">        <i>identisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cylinderformet">  <i>cylinderformet</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stilig">          <i>stilig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="faderlig">        <i>faderlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="godmodig">        <i>godmodig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ideal">           <i>ideal</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="naiv">            <i>naiv</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="værdifuld">       <i>værdifuld</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nyligt" a="PT">   <i>nyligt</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
